Nevada, session 83, SB345.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 616B.350 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.350 1. A group of five or more employers may not act
as an association of self-insured public employers unless the group:
(a) Is composed of employers that perform related activities in
a given industry and are engaged in the same or similar
classifications of employment; and
(b) Has been issued a certificate to act as such an association by
the Commissioner.
2. A group of five or more employers may not act as an
association of self-insured private employers unless each member of
the group [:] performs related activities in a given industry, and:
(a) Is a member or associate member of a bona fide trade
association, as determined by the Commissioner, which:
(1) Is incorporated in this State; and
(2) Has been in existence for at least 5 years; and
(b) Has been issued a certificate to act as such an association by
the Commissioner.
3. An association of public or private employers that wishes to
be issued a certificate must file with the Commissioner an
application for certification.
4. The application must include:
(a) The name of the association.
(b) The address of:
(1) The principal office of the association.
(2) The location where the books and records of the
association will be maintained.
(c) The date the association was organized.
(d) The name and address of each member of the association.
(e) The names of the initial members of the board of trustees and
the name of the initial association’s administrator.
-
*SB345*

– 4 –
(f) Such other information as the Commissioner may require.
5. The application must be accompanied by:
(a) A nonrefundable filing fee of $1,000 and, in addition to any
other fee or charge, all applicable fees required pursuant to
NRS 680C.110.
(b) Proof of compliance with NRS 616B.353.
(c) Proof that the association or its third-party administrator is
licensed or otherwise authorized to conduct business in this State
pursuant to title 57 of NRS.
(d) A copy of the agreements entered into with the association’s
administrator and a third-party administrator.
(e) A copy of the bylaws of the association [.] , which must:
(1) Contain a statement of fiduciary responsibility for
administering the plan of insurance.
(2) Establish a procedure for nominating persons who may
be elected to the board of trustees of the association which is free
from outside influence, control or pressure.
(f) [A] An executed copy of an indemnity agreement [jointly
and severally binding the association and each member of the
association to secure the payment of all compensation due pursuant
to chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS.] as required by
NRS 616B.353.
(g) A pro forma financial statement prepared by an independent
certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles that shows the financial ability of the
association to pay all compensation due pursuant to chapters 616A
to 617, inclusive, of NRS.
(h) A reviewed financial statement prepared by an independent
certified public accountant for each proposed member of the
association or evidence of the ability of the association or its
proposed members to provide a solvency bond pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 616B.353.
(i) Proof that each member of the association will make the
initial payment to the association required pursuant to NRS
616B.416 on a date specified by the Commissioner. The payment
shall be deemed to be a part of the assessment required to be paid by
each member for the first year of self-insurance if certification is
issued to the association.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, any
financial information relating to a member of an association
received by the Commissioner pursuant to the provisions of this
section is confidential and must not be disclosed.
7. For the purposes of this section, “associate member of a
bona fide trade association” means a supplier whose business, as
determined by the Commissioner:
-
*SB345*

– 5 –
(a) Is limited to a specific industry; and
(b) Primarily involves providing a product or service that is
directly used or consumed by substantially all of the members of the
trade association or bears a direct relationship to the business of the
members of the association.
Sec. 2. NRS 616B.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.353 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers shall:
(a) Execute an indemnity agreement jointly and severally
binding the association and each member of the association to
secure the payment of all compensation due pursuant to chapters
616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS. The indemnity agreement must be
in a form prescribed by the Commissioner [.] and must authorize
the association to assess fees from members if any member
defaults. The agreement must notify members that the
Commissioner may assess the association to provide for claims
against another association pursuant to NRS 616B.443. An
association may add provisions to the indemnity agreement if they
are first approved by the Commissioner.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, maintain a
policy of specific and aggregate excess insurance with a self-
insured retention of not less than $250,000 in a form and amount
required by the Commissioner. The excess insurance must be
written by an insurer approved by the Commissioner. To determine
the amount of excess insurance required, the Commissioner shall
consider:
(1) The number of members in the association;
(2) If the association is an association of self-insured public
employers, the types of governmental services provided by the
members of the association;
(3) If the association is an association of self-insured private
employers, the classifications of employment of the members of the
association;
(4) The number of years the association has been in
existence; and
(5) Such other information as the Commissioner deems
necessary.
 Nothing in this paragraph prohibits an association from
purchasing secondary excess insurance in addition to the excess
insurance required by this paragraph.
(c) Collect an annual assessment from each member of the
association in an aggregate amount of at least $250,000 or in an
aggregate amount which the Commissioner determines is
satisfactory based on an annual review conducted by the
Commissioner of the actuarial solvency of the association. Money
-
*SB345*

– 6 –
collected from assessments may be used only for the
administration of the plan and to pay claims.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), deposit as
security with the Commissioner a bond executed by the association
as principal, and by a licensed surety, payable to the State of
Nevada, and conditioned upon the payment of compensation for
injuries and occupational diseases to their employees. The bond
must be in an amount determined by the Commissioner to be
reasonably sufficient to ensure payment of such compensation, but
in no event may it be less than $100,000.
(e) In lieu of a bond, deposit with the Commissioner a like
amount of lawful money of the United States or any other form of
security authorized by NRS 100.065. If security is provided in the
form of a savings certificate, certificate of deposit or investment
certificate, the certificate must state that the amount is unavailable
for withdrawal except upon order of the Commissioner.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, in addition to
complying with the requirements of subsection 1, an association of
self-insured private employers shall:
(a) At the time of initial qualification and until the association
has operated successfully as a qualified association of self-insured
private employers for 3 years, as determined by the Commissioner,
have a combined tangible net worth of all members in the
association of at least $2,500,000, as evidenced by a statement of
tangible net worth provided to the Division of Insurance of the
Department of Business and Industry by an independent certified
public accountant; or
(b) After 3 years of successful operation as a qualified
association of self-insured private employers, as determined by the
Commissioner, have combined net cash flows from operating
activities plus net cash flows from financing activities of all
members in the association of five times the average of claims paid
for each of the last 3 years or $7,500,000, whichever is less.
3. In lieu of complying with the requirements of subsection 2,
the association’s administrator shall ensure that a solvency bond, in
a form prescribed by the Commissioner and in an aggregate amount
of at least $2,500,000, is deposited with the Commissioner by the
association or members of the association on behalf of the
association.
4. The association’s administrator shall deposit with the
Commissioner a bond executed by the association’s administrator as
principal, and by a licensed surety, payable to the State of Nevada,
and conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties.
The bond must be in an amount determined by the Commissioner [.]
, but in no event may it be less than $2,000,000.
-
*SB345*

– 7 –
5. Any third-party administrator providing claims services for
the association shall deposit with the Commissioner a bond executed
by the third-party administrator as principal, and by a licensed
surety, payable to the State of Nevada, and conditioned upon the
faithful performance of its duties. The bond must be in an amount
determined by the Commissioner.
6. The Commissioner may increase or decrease the amount of
any bond or money required to be deposited by this section in
accordance with chapter 681B of NRS and the Commissioner’s
regulations for loss reserves in casualty insurance. If the
Commissioner requires an association, association’s administrator or
third-party administrator to increase its deposit, the Commissioner
may specify the form of the additional security. The association,
association’s administrator or third-party administrator shall comply
with such a requirement within 60 days after receiving notice from
the Commissioner.
7. The Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public and
Private Employers is hereby created in the State Agency Fund for
Bonds. All money received by the Commissioner pursuant to this
section must be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of
the Account. All claims against this Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
Sec. 3. NRS 616B.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.365 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers must be operated by a board of trustees consisting of at
least five members who are nominated according to the terms set
forth in the bylaws of the association and whom the members of
the association elect for terms set forth in the bylaws of the
association. If the association is an association of self-insured:
(a) Public employers, the members of the board of trustees must
be officers or managerial employees of the public employers who
are members of the association.
(b) Private employers, [at least two-thirds of] the members of
the board of trustees must be managerial employees, officers or
directors of the members of the association. No association’s
administrator or third-party administrator employed by the
association, or any owner, officer, employee or other person
affiliated with the association’s administrator or third-party
administrator, may serve as a member of the board of trustees. Each
member of the board of trustees must be a resident of this State or
an officer of a corporation authorized to do business in this State.
2. The board of trustees of an association shall:
(a) Ensure the prompt payment of any compensation due
pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS.
-
*SB345*

– 8 –
(b) Take such actions as are necessary to protect the assets of the
association.
(c) Employ full-time an association’s administrator to carry out
the policies of the board of trustees and perform such duties as the
board delegates to him or her. An association’s administrator shall
not perform any of the duties assigned to a third-party administrator.
(d) Employ a third-party administrator to carry out the duties set
forth in NRS 616B.503.
(e) Employ an independent certified public accountant to
prepare the statement of financial condition required by
NRS 616B.404.
(f) Maintain minutes of its meetings and make the minutes
available for inspection by the Commissioner.
3. The board of trustees of an association shall not:
(a) Extend credit to any member of the association for the
payment of that member’s annual assessment, except pursuant to a
payment plan approved by the Commissioner.
(b) Borrow any money from the association or in the name of
the association, except in the ordinary course of its business, without
the prior approval of the Commissioner.
Sec. 4. NRS 616B.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.410 1. The Commissioner shall cause to be conducted
at least annually an audit of each association of self-insured public
or private employers in order to verify:
(a) The standard industrial classification of each member of the
association;
(b) The individual experience of each member of the
association;
(c) The payroll of each member of the association; and
(d) The assessment required to be paid by each member of the
association [.] , to ensure the assessment is reasonable.
2. The audit required by this section must be conducted by an
auditor approved by the Commissioner.
3. A report of the audit must be filed with the Commissioner in
a form required by the Commissioner.
4. The association or any member of the association may
request a hearing before the Commissioner to object to any standard
industrial classification assigned to a member of the association as a
result of the audit. If the Commissioner determines that the
assessment required to be paid by any member of the association is:
(a) Insufficient because of the standard industrial classification
assigned to the member, the Commissioner shall order the
association to collect from that member any amount required to
recover the deficiency.
-
*SB345*

– 9 –
(b) Excessive because of the standard industrial classification
assigned to the member, the Commissioner shall order the
association to pay to the member the excess amount collected.
5. The expenses of any audit conducted pursuant to this section
must be paid by the association.
Sec. 5. NRS 616B.413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.413 1. If the assets of an association of self-insured
public or private employers exceed the amount necessary for the
association to:
(a) Pay its obligations and administrative expenses;
(b) Carry reasonable reserves; and
(c) Provide for contingencies,
 the board of trustees of the association may, after obtaining the
approval of the Commissioner, [declare and distribute dividends to
the members] reduce the annual assessment required to be paid by
each member of the association.
2. [Any dividend declared pursuant to subsection 1 must be
distributed not less than 12 months after the end of the fund year.
3. A dividend may be paid only to those members who are
members of the association for the entire fund year. The payment of
a dividend must not be conditioned upon the member continuing his
or her membership in the association after the fund year.
4.] An association shall [give to each prospective member of
the association a written description of its plan for distributing] not
declare or distribute dividends [when the prospective member
applies for membership in] to the members of the association.
Sec. 6. NRS 616B.419 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.419 Each association of self-insured public or private
employers shall : [maintain:]
1. [Actuarially] Maintain actuarially appropriate loss reserves.
Such reserves must include reserves for:
(a) Actual claims and the expenses associated with those claims;
and
(b) Claims incurred but not reported, and the expenses
associated with those claims.
2. [Reserves] Maintain reserves for uncollected debts based on
the experience of the association or other associations.
3. Upon request, furnish to the Commissioner any
information necessary to review the reserves described in this
section.
Sec. 7. NRS 616B.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.425 1. The Commissioner may issue an order requiring
an association of self-insured public or private employers , the
board of trustees of the association, the association’s
administrator, a third-party administrator employed by the
-
*SB345*

– 10 –
association or a member of the association to cease and desist from
engaging in any act or practice found to be in violation of any
provision of NRS 616B.350 to 616B.446, inclusive, or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
2. If the Commissioner determines that an association , the
board of trustees of the association, the association’s
administrator, a third-party administrator employed by the
association or a member of the association has violated an order to
cease and desist, the Commissioner may impose an administrative
fine of not more than $10,000 for each violation of the order, not to
exceed an aggregate amount of $100,000, or withdraw the certificate
of the association [,] or the association’s administrator, or both.
Sec. 8. NRS 616B.428 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.428 1. The Commissioner may impose an
administrative fine for each violation of any provision of NRS
616B.350 to 616B.446, inclusive, or any regulation adopted
pursuant thereto. Except as otherwise provided in those sections, the
amount of the fine may not exceed $1,000 for each violation or an
aggregate amount of $10,000.
2. The Commissioner may withdraw the certificate of an
association of self-insured public or private employers or the
association’s administrator if:
(a) The [association’s] certificate of the association or the
association’s administrator was obtained by fraud;
(b) The application for certification contained a material
misrepresentation;
(c) The association is found to be insolvent;
(d) The association fails to have five or more members;
(e) The association fails to pay the costs of any examination or
any penalty, fee or assessment required by the provisions of chapters
616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS;
(f) The association or the association’s administrator fails to
comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or chapter 616A,
616C, 616D or 617 of NRS, or any regulation adopted pursuant
thereto;
(g) The association or the association’s administrator fails to
comply with any order of the Commissioner within the time
prescribed by the provisions of chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or
chapter 617 of NRS or in the order of the Commissioner; or
(h) The association , the association’s administrator or its third-
party administrator misappropriates, converts, illegally withholds or
refuses to pay any money to which a person is entitled and that was
entrusted to the association in its fiduciary capacity.
3. If the Commissioner withdraws the certification of an
association of self-insured public or private employers [,] or the
-
*SB345*

– 11 –
association’s administrator, each employer who is a member of the
association remains liable for his or her obligations incurred before
and after the order of withdrawal.
4. Any employer who is a member of an association whose
certification is withdrawn shall, on the effective date of the
withdrawal, qualify as an employer pursuant to NRS 616B.650.
Sec. 9. NRS 616B.431 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.431 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616D.120,
before any action may be taken pursuant to subsection 2, the
Commissioner shall arrange an informal meeting with an association
of self-insured public or private employers or the association’s
administrator to discuss and seek correction of any conduct which
would be grounds for withdrawal of the certificate of the association
[.] or the association’s administrator.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and NRS
616D.120, before the withdrawal of the certificate of any association
of self-insured public or private employers [,] or the association’s
administrator, the Commissioner shall give written notice to the
association or the association’s administrator by certified mail that
[its] the certificate will be withdrawn 10 days after receipt of the
notice unless, within that time, the association or the association’s
administrator corrects the conduct set forth in the notice as the
reason for the withdrawal or submits a written request for a hearing
to the Commissioner.
3. The Commissioner may grant additional time, not to exceed
an additional 120 days, before the withdrawal of the certificate of an
association or the association’s administrator if:
(a) The grounds for withdrawal of the certificate of the
association or the association’s administrator are based on
paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of NRS 616B.428; and
(b) The association or the association’s administrator is
financially sound and capable of fulfilling its commitments.
4. If the association or the association’s administrator
requests a hearing:
(a) The Commissioner shall set a date for a hearing within 20
days after receiving the request and give the association or the
association’s administrator at least 10 business days’ notice of the
time and place of the hearing.
(b) A record of the hearing must be kept, but it need not be
transcribed unless requested by the association or the association’s
administrator with the cost of transcription to be charged to the
association [.] or the association’s administrator.
(c) Within 5 business days after the hearing, the Commissioner
shall either affirm or disaffirm the withdrawal and give the
association or the association’s administrator written notice thereof
-
*SB345*

– 12 –
by certified mail. If withdrawal of certification is affirmed, the
withdrawal becomes effective 10 business days after the association
or the association’s administrator receives notice of the affirmance
unless within that period the association or the association’s
administrator corrects the conduct which was grounds for the
withdrawal or petitions for judicial review of the affirmance.
5. If the withdrawal of certification is affirmed following
judicial review, the withdrawal becomes effective 5 days after entry
of the final decree of affirmance.
Sec. 10. NRS 616B.437 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.437 Any association of self-insured public or private
employers or an association’s administrator that is aggrieved by a
decision of the Commissioner may petition for judicial review in the
manner provided by chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 11. NRS 616B.446 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.446 1. The Commissioner may adopt such regulations
as are necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 616B.350 to
616B.446, inclusive.
2. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations which establish
uniform policies for and the required contents of an underwriting
plan for each association of self-insured public or private
employers.
Sec. 12. NRS 616D.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616D.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if
the Administrator determines that an insurer, organization for
managed care, health care provider, third-party administrator,
employer or professional employer organization has:
(a) Induced a claimant to fail to report an accidental injury or
occupational disease;
(b) Without justification, persuaded a claimant to:
(1) Settle for an amount which is less than reasonable;
(2) Settle for an amount which is less than reasonable while a
hearing or an appeal is pending; or
(3) Accept less than the compensation found to be due the
claimant by a hearing officer, appeals officer, court of competent
jurisdiction, written settlement agreement, written stipulation or the
Division when carrying out its duties pursuant to chapters 616A to
617, inclusive, of NRS;
(c) Refused to pay or unreasonably delayed payment to a
claimant of compensation or other relief found to be due the
claimant by a hearing officer, appeals officer, court of competent
jurisdiction, written settlement agreement, written stipulation or the
Division when carrying out its duties pursuant to chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS, if the refusal or delay
occurs:
-
*SB345*

– 13 –
(1) Later than 10 days after the date of the settlement
agreement or stipulation;
(2) Later than 30 days after the date of the decision of a
court, hearing officer, appeals officer or the Division, unless a stay
has been granted; or
(3) Later than 10 days after a stay of the decision of a court,
hearing officer, appeals officer or the Division has been lifted;
(d) Refused to process a claim for compensation pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS;
(e) Made it necessary for a claimant to initiate proceedings
pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS for compensation or other relief found to be due the claimant
by a hearing officer, appeals officer, court of competent jurisdiction,
written settlement agreement, written stipulation or the Division
when carrying out its duties pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS;
(f) Failed to comply with the Division’s regulations covering the
payment of an assessment relating to the funding of costs of
administration of chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS;
(g) Failed to provide or unreasonably delayed payment to an
injured employee or reimbursement to an insurer pursuant to
NRS 616C.165;
(h) Engaged in a pattern of untimely payments to injured
employees; or
(i) Intentionally failed to comply with any provision of, or
regulation adopted pursuant to, this chapter or chapter 616A, 616B,
616C or 617 of NRS,
 the Administrator shall impose an administrative fine of $1,500
for each initial violation, or a fine of $15,000 for a second or
subsequent violation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS, if the Administrator determines
that an insurer, organization for managed care, health care provider,
third-party administrator, employer or professional employer
organization has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter
or chapter 616A, 616B, 616C or 617 of NRS, or any regulation
adopted pursuant thereto, the Administrator may take any of the
following actions:
(a) Issue a notice of correction for:
(1) A minor violation, as defined by regulations adopted by
the Division; or
(2) A violation involving the payment of compensation in an
amount which is greater than that required by any provision of this
chapter or chapter 616A, 616B, 616C or 617 of NRS, or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
-
*SB345*

– 14 –
 The notice of correction must set forth with particularity the
violation committed and the manner in which the violation may be
corrected. The provisions of this section do not authorize the
Administrator to modify or negate in any manner a determination or
any portion of a determination made by a hearing officer, appeals
officer or court of competent jurisdiction or a provision contained in
a written settlement agreement or written stipulation.
(b) Impose an administrative fine for:
(1) A second or subsequent violation for which a notice of
correction has been issued pursuant to paragraph (a); or
(2) Any other violation of this chapter or chapter 616A,
616B, 616C or 617 of NRS, or any regulation adopted pursuant
thereto, for which a notice of correction may not be issued pursuant
to paragraph (a).
 The fine imposed must not be greater than $375 for an initial
violation, or more than $3,000 for any second or subsequent
violation.
(c) Order a plan of corrective action to be submitted to the
Administrator within 30 days after the date of the order.
3. If the Administrator determines that a violation of any of the
provisions of paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, (h) or (i) of subsection
1 has occurred, the Administrator shall order the insurer,
organization for managed care, health care provider, third-party
administrator, employer or professional employer organization to
pay to the claimant a benefit penalty:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), in an amount
that is not less than $17,000 and not greater than $120,000; or
(b) Of $3,000 if the violation involves a late payment of
compensation or other relief to a claimant in an amount which is
less than $500 or which is not more than 14 days late.
4. To determine the amount of the benefit penalty, the
Administrator shall consider the degree of physical harm suffered by
the injured employee or the dependents of the injured employee as a
result of the violation of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h) or (i) of
subsection 1, the amount of compensation found to be due the
claimant and the number of fines and benefit penalties, other than a
benefit penalty described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3,
previously imposed against the insurer, organization for managed
care, health care provider, third-party administrator, employer or
professional employer organization pursuant to this section. The
Administrator shall also consider the degree of economic harm
suffered by the injured employee or the dependents of the injured
employee as a result of the violation of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d),
(e), (h) or (i) of subsection 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the benefit penalty is for the benefit of the claimant and
-
*SB345*

– 15 –
must be paid directly to the claimant within 15 days after the date of
the Administrator’s determination. If the claimant is the injured
employee and the claimant dies before the benefit penalty is paid to
him or her, the benefit penalty must be paid to the estate of the
claimant. Proof of the payment of the benefit penalty must be
submitted to the Administrator within 15 days after the date of the
Administrator’s determination unless an appeal is filed pursuant to
NRS 616D.140 and a stay has been granted. Any compensation to
which the claimant may otherwise be entitled pursuant to chapters
616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS must not be
reduced by the amount of any benefit penalty received pursuant to
this subsection. To determine the amount of the benefit penalty in
cases of multiple violations occurring within a certain period of
time, the Administrator shall adopt regulations which take into
consideration:
(a) The number of violations within a certain number of years
for which a benefit penalty was imposed; and
(b) The number of claims handled by the insurer, organization
for managed care, health care provider, third-party administrator,
employer or professional employer organization in relation to the
number of benefit penalties previously imposed within the period of
time prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a).
5. In addition to any fine or benefit penalty imposed pursuant
to this section, the Administrator may assess against an insurer who
violates any regulation concerning the reporting of claims
expenditures or premiums received that are used to calculate an
assessment an administrative penalty of up to twice the amount of
any underpaid assessment.
6. If:
(a) The Administrator determines that a person has violated any
of the provisions of NRS 616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240,
616D.300, 616D.310 or 616D.350 to 616D.440, inclusive; and
(b) The Fraud Control Unit for Industrial Insurance of the Office
of the Attorney General established pursuant to NRS 228.420
notifies the Administrator that the Unit will not prosecute the person
for that violation,
 the Administrator shall impose an administrative fine of not more
than $15,000.
7. Two or more fines of $1,000 or more imposed in 1 year for
acts enumerated in subsection 1 must be considered by the
Commissioner as evidence for the withdrawal of:
(a) A certificate to act as a self-insured employer.
(b) A certificate to act as an association of self-insured public or
private employers [.] or an association’s administrator.
(c) A certificate of registration as a third-party administrator.
-
*SB345*

– 16 –
8. The Commissioner may, without complying with the
provisions of NRS 616B.327 or 616B.431, withdraw the
certification of a self-insured employer, association of self-insured
public or private employers , association’s administrator or third-
party administrator if, after a hearing, it is shown that the self-
insured employer, association of self-insured public or private
employers , association’s administrator or third-party administrator
violated any provision of subsection 1.
9. If the Administrator determines that a vocational
rehabilitation counselor has violated the provisions of NRS
616C.543, the Administrator may impose an administrative fine on
the vocational rehabilitation counselor of not more than $250 for a
first violation, $500 for a second violation and $1,000 for a third or
subsequent violation.
10. The Administrator may make a claim against the bond
required pursuant to NRS 683A.0857 for the payment of any
administrative fine or benefit penalty imposed for a violation of the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 13. 1. A certificate issued by the Commissioner of
Insurance pursuant to NRS 616B.359 to an association of self-
insured public or private employers or an association’s administrator
which is in effect on October 1, 2025, expires on October 1, 2026.
2. An association of self-insured public or private employers
which holds a certificate described in subsection 1 that wishes to
continue to act as an association of self-insured public or private
employers after October 1, 2026, must, on or before that date,
submit a new application pursuant to NRS 616B.350 and be issued a
new certificate pursuant to NRS 616B.359.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Association of self-insured private employers” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 616A.050.
(b) “Association of self-insured public employers” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 616A.055.
(c) “Association’s administrator” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 616A.060.
Sec. 14. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 13, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB345*